Hawaii statutes.
§88-139 Return of contributions. Any
service member may resign from the system at any time, if the service member so
chooses, and upon such resignation the service member shall be entitled to the
return of the service member's accumulated contributions as provided in
sections 88-96 and 88-341, including any amount to the service member's credit
in the annuity savings fund which shall have been contributed by the State or
any county under the Servicemen's Act, but the service member shall cease to be
entitled to any of the benefits of the Servicemen's Act or of sections 88-131
to 88-142, except the return of accumulated contributions, upon the effective
date of the service member's resignation. [L 1951, c 262, pt of §3; RL 1955,
§6-118; HRS §88-129; am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 2004, c 179,
§22]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next